Hawaii statutes.
§431:15-107 Commissioner's reports.
The commissioner shall make and file annual reports and any other required
reports for the companies proceeded against under this article in the manner
and form and within the time required by law of insurers authorized to do
business in this State. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next